District of Columbia statutes.
4-1345.03

Repealed

Scope and design of programs and services.

Repealed.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 5204, 53 DCR 6899
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9028, 61 DCR 9990
This section is referenced in § 4-1345.02.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5204 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5204 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5204 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9028 and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9028 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9028 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Section 9029 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that the repeal by § 9028 of the act shall apply as of September 30, 2014.